Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1908.01
Nuclear medicine technologist, defined.

Nuclear medicine technologist means a person who meets the requirements for training and experience for nuclear medicine technology under the Radiation Control Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act.

Laws 2008, LB928, § 9.

Radiation Control Act, see section 71-3519.